Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Chapter 21 County Financial Management System of 1981
5-21-119. Purchasing system.

The committee, with the assistance of the purchasing agent, shall establish a purchasing system for the county.

Such system shall provide, among other procedures, the following:

Review of all contracts or purchases for biddable supplies, materials, equipment, and other needs of the county, shall be made by the purchasing agent;

No purchase or contract shall be made when the bid prices exceed the current market price for the same merchandise or service;

Purchases and contracts shall be awarded based on the lowest and best bid;

Specifications development shall be made by the department, agency or official to receive the merchandise, construction or service;

The purchasing agent shall:

Review specifications and changes to allow for maximum competition of prospective bidders;

Prepare formal and informal bids;

Collect sealed bids;

Open bids through a procedure open to the public;

Evaluate, compare and submit bids for approval by the committee, if so deemed by the committee;

Issue purchase orders and contracts; and

Verify receiving the merchandise or service;

The director shall:

Accept requisitions by the department, agency or official, and, if such supplies are not currently on hand, transmit such requisition to the purchasing agent;

Verify budget appropriations before authorizing a purchase;

Approve invoices for payment; and

Pay invoices and obligations of the county as provided herein; and

Emergency purchases, total cost bidding, blanket purchases for small orders, grouping of purchases of the various departments, and other methods for receiving the most competitive price and best bid. Emergency purchases shall be limited to needs arising that are not normally foreseeable. Emergency purchases shall not be permissible if a department or agency fails to properly plan for the need, proper purchasing procedures, and delivery time.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 19.

Cross-References. County purchasing laws, title 5, ch. 14.

Attorney General Opinions. A county could not award a road design and construction contract on a “design-build” basis, without competitive bidding, to an engineering firm that had partnered with a road construction firm for that purpose, even though the county's governing body believed such an award to be in the best interest of the taxpayers, as the county was required to advertise the proposed letting of such a contract and to receive sealed bids for the proposed road project, OAG 00-086, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 88 (5/5/00).

5-21-120. Bidding.

The committee shall authorize the dollar limitation when formal competitive bids are required but not to exceed the amount as authorized by state law for the highway and education departments or other such amounts as established by law.

Subject to the policies and regulations of the committee, “biddable items” means any need of the county where more than one (1) bidder or contractor in the county's trade area can provide the material or service. Specifications shall not be written to exclude vendors and contractors or limit the bidding to a specific vendor or contractor.

The county shall be liable for the payment of all purchases of supplies, materials, equipment and contractual service made in accordance with this chapter, but shall not be liable for the payment of such purchases made contrary to its provisions unless such item is specifically approved by the committee.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 20.

Cross-References. County purchasing laws, title 5, ch. 14.

Attorney General Opinions. A county could not award a road design and construction contract on a “design-build” basis, without competitive bidding, to an engineering firm that had partnered with a road construction firm for that purpose, even though the county's governing body believed such an award to be in the best interest of the taxpayers, as the county was required to advertise the proposed letting of such a contract and to receive sealed bids for the proposed road project, OAG 00-086, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 88 (5/5/00).

5-21-121. Conflicts of interest.

The director, purchasing agent, members of the committee, members of the county legislative body, or other officials, employees, or members of the board of education or highway commission shall not be financially interested or have any personal beneficial interest, either directly or indirectly, in the purchase of any supplies, materials, equipment or contractual services for the county.

No firm, corporation, partnership, association or individual furnishing any such supplies, materials, equipment or contractual services, shall give or offer nor shall the director or purchasing agent or any assistant or employee accept or receive directly or indirectly from any person, firm, corporation, partnership or association to whom any contract may be awarded, by rebate, gift or otherwise, any money or other things of value whatsoever, or any promise, obligation or contract for future reward or compensation.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 21; 2012, ch. 640, §§ 1, 2.

Attorney General Opinions. The sale of items by the spouse of an employee of the school board to that same school system would give rise to a prohibited conflict of interest, OAG 00-181, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 184 (11/22/00).

A member of the county school board is not prohibited by T.C.A. § 5-21-121(a) from contracting with the county sheriff's department to provide counseling services, OAG 02-128, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 133 (11/25/02).

T.C.A. § 5-21-121(a) does not prohibit a county employee from also being the county finance director, purchasing agent, member of the county financial management committee, member of the county legislative body, member of the board of education or highway commission, or any other county official, OAG 02-128, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 133 (11/25/02).

Except for the narrow exception of a county commissioner in T.C.A. § 12-4-101(c)(1), a violation of the general conflict of interest statute, T.C.A. § 5-21-121(a), has no effect on the validity of an official's vote, OAG 02-128, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 133 (11/25/02).

This section would not prohibit a member of the county financial management committee from being interested in the employment contract between his or her spouse and the county, but since the statute does not define the term, “personal beneficial interest,” therefore, a member could have a prohibited conflict of interest in a purchase of supplies, materials, or equipment for the finance department where his or her spouse is employed, OAG 05-017, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/03/05).

Conflict of Interest — Member of County Board of Education. OAG 12-04, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 108 (11/9/12).

Same individual serving as county finance director and member of school board. OAG 12-19, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/22/12).

5-21-122. Committee members — Compensation.

The county legislative body shall set the compensation based on the service and time rendered in implementing this chapter for members of the various committees created in this chapter.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 22.

5-21-123. County employees unaffected.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, each department, agency or official shall have the authority to hire personnel and set salaries and to determine the needs for its use, all subject to budget limitations and the availability of funds.

The authority of the committee, director or purchasing agent shall be limited to this chapter and such policies necessary to implement this chapter. They shall not have the authority to veto the hiring and dismissal of personnel of the various county departments, agencies, or officials or set salaries or determine the needs of such departments.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 23.

5-21-124. Education department — Withdrawal from system.

In the event the director or purchasing agent established under this chapter does not maintain records, follow accounting and budgetary procedures, and submit timely reports and information as prescribed by state law and the commissioner of education, the commissioner, after a hearing on the issue of such neglect, shall remove the education department of the county involved from the county financial management system established by this chapter by written notification to the presiding officer of the county legislative body.

Upon notice from the commissioner, the county legislative body shall transfer sufficient funds from the control of the department to provide financial services in the county education department under the supervision of the county director of schools, as provided by general law.

State funds may be withheld for failure to provide adequate funds to transfer the responsibilities to the education department.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 24.

5-21-125. Violations — Penalties.

Any official or employee of the county, or of any institution or agency thereof, who fails or refuses to perform the duties required by this chapter or who fails or refuses otherwise to conform to this chapter commits a Class C misdemeanor, and is subject to removal from office or position.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 29; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

5-21-126. Adoption of system.

This chapter shall be local in effect and shall become effective in a particular county upon a two-thirds (2/3) majority vote of the county legislative body adopting this chapter, or upon a majority of the voters casting votes in any election held for the purpose of approving this chapter.

The procedure for elections held for the purpose of approving this chapter shall be that the county election commission shall call and conduct an election on the question pursuant to § 2-3-204 after receiving a petition signed by ten percent (10%) of the qualified voters of the county, stating that they favor this law and requesting that an election be held in the county on the subject, the number of qualified voters in the county being deemed to be the total number of votes cast for all candidates for governor in the last general election; or upon a resolution of the county legislative body, duly certified to the election commission, requesting such an election.

In such an election, the propositions to be voted upon shall be stated on the ballot on separate lines in the following manner: “For the county financial management system” and “Against the county financial management system.”

This chapter shall not apply in any county having a population of not less than two hundred seventy-six thousand (276,000) nor more than two hundred seventy-seven thousand (277,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, §§ 26, 31; 1998, ch. 618, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality and application to Blount County, OAG 88-202, 1988 Tenn. AG LEXIS 203 (12/2/88).

The vote by a county commission to adopt the County Financial Management System of 1981 was insufficient where the commission had 16 members, 14 members were present, and 10 members voted to adopt the act; an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the entire authorized membership of the commission was required and, therefore, the affirmative vote of eleven members was required, OAG 00-180, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 183 (11/22/00).

A county commissioner who was a bookkeeper for the county board of education did not have a conflict of interest that required the commissioner to abstain from a vote regarding the adoption of the County Financial Management System of 1981, OAG 00-180, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 183 (11/22/00).

5-21-127. Implementation of system.

Upon this chapter's becoming law in a county, the county legislative body shall appoint members of the committee at the next meeting of such body.

Within thirty (30) days after such appointment, the committee shall meet, elect a chair, and start the process for hiring a director.

The committee shall also develop plans for implementing the financial management system beginning July 1 of the next fiscal year, and completing the implementation process by August 1 of the second fiscal year.

In implementing the system, the committee and director shall seek recommendations from the comptroller of the treasury, the state department of education, the University of Tennessee's county technical assistance service, and other such organizations.

After an implementation plan has been developed and approved by the committee, a report shall be submitted to the county governing body by July 1 of the fiscal year in which the system is to be implemented.

The committee shall publish in a local newspaper of county-wide circulation a notice specifying that:

The county has adopted the “Local Option Financial Management System” and all employees, vendors and contractors must abide by its provisions beginning on a date specified in the notice; and

The act or policies to implement the act will be available on a date specified in the notice and copies may be obtained at that time.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 25; 2012, ch. 578, § 1.

5-21-128. Suspension of private or local acts.

Upon ratification by the county legislative body or the people in a referendum and the full implementation of the chapter's provisions on or before August 1 of the second fiscal year, the operation of all private or local acts relative to county finances, budgeting, and purchasing in conflict with this chapter are suspended until such time as this chapter is revoked as provided in § 5-21-129.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 27.

5-21-129. Revocation of adoption.

This chapter once adopted may be revoked by the same method used to adopt the chapter.

Such revocation shall be effective with the fiscal year beginning at least sixty (60) days after passage of the resolution or referendum.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 28; 1986, ch. 732, § 2.

5-21-130. Sale of surplus, obsolete or unusable county-owned property on Internet web site.

In addition to any other methods for sales of county-owned property authorized by law, any county having adopted the County Financial Management System of 1981, compiled in this chapter, is authorized to conduct a sale of county-owned property that has become surplus, obsolete, or unusable on any Internet auction web site that is approved by the county's financial management committee.

Acts 2008, ch. 890, § 1.